Washington statutes.
RCW 41.68.040

Determination of eligibility.

(1) The department of enterprise services shall determine the eligibility of a claimant to receive reparations authorized by this chapter. The department shall then notify the claimant by mail of its determination regarding the claimant's eligibility.

(2) The department may adopt rules that will assist in the fair determination of eligibility and the processing of claims. The department, however, has no obligation to directly notify any person of possible eligibility for reparation of salary losses under this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 475; 1983 1st ex.s. c 15 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.